Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska77-5006
Office space.

The state shall furnish the commission and its commissioners with appropriate office space in Lincoln, Nebraska, together with suitable equipment, furniture, and supplies.

Laws 1995, LB 490, § 6.